Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2117
Credit of state not pledged.

Under no circumstances is the credit of the State of Nebraska, or any political subdivision thereof, pledged by the provisions of sections 21-2101 to 21-2117.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 17, p. 308.